Colorado, session 2026A, HB1115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-64-103, amend
(4)(b) as follows:
27-64-103. 988 crisis hotline enterprise - creation - powers and
duties.
(4) The enterprise's primary powers and duties are to:
(b) Effective January 1, 2022, impose a prepaid wireless 988 charge
on each retail transaction, as defined in section 40-17.5-104 (1)(d) SECTION
40-17.5-101 (10), in an amount to be established annually by the enterprise,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

in collaboration with the public utilities commission, but not to exceed
thirty cents per each retail transaction in which prepaid wireless service is
purchased in Colorado. On or before October 1, 2021, and on or before
October 1 of each year thereafter, the enterprise, in collaboration with the
public utilities commission, shall establish the amount of the charge for the
next calendar year. The amount of the charge must be reasonably calculated
to meet the needs of the enterprise.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11-101, amend (21)
as follows:
29-11-101. Definitions.
As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(21) "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" means A
wireless telecommunications access that allows the user to make 911 calls,
is paid for in advance, and is sold in predetermined units or dollars, of
which the number of units or dollars available to the caller declines with use
in a known amount. SERVICE THAT:
(a) IS PAID FOR IN ADVANCE;
(b) IS SOLD IN PREDETERMINED UNITS OF TIME OR MONEY THAT
DECLINE WITH USE IN A KNOWN AMOUNT OR PROVIDES UNLIMITED USE OF
THE SERVICE FOR A FIXED PERIOD OF TIME; AND
(c) ALLOWS A SERVICE USER TO MAKE 911 CALLS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11-102.5, amend
(1)(e), (3)(a), (3)(b), and (3)(d); and add (1)(d.5) as follows:
29-11-102.5. Imposition of charge on prepaid wireless - prepaid
wireless trust cash fund - rules - applicability - definitions - repeal.
(1) As used in this section:
(d.5) "PURCHASE" MEANS EXCHANGES OF MONEY AND EXCHANGES
OF NONMONETARY CONSIDERATION, SUCH AS CONSUMER INFORMATION
REQUIRED FOR REIMBURSEMENT CLAIMS UNDER FEDERALLY SUPPORTED
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

SERVICES OR PROGRAMS.
(e) "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service from a seller OR PROVIDER for any purpose
other than resale. For the purposes of this section, "purchase" includes
exchanges of money and exchanges of nonmonetary consideration, such as
consumer information required for reimbursement claims under federally
supported services or programs.
(3) (a) The seller or provider who uses federally supported services
or programs shall remit any collected prepaid wireless 911 charges to the
department at the times and in the manner provided in part 1 of article 26
of title 39. The department shall establish, by rule, registration and payment
procedures that substantially coincide with the registration and payment
procedures that apply under part 1 of article 26 of title 39. A seller OR
PROVIDER is subject to the penalties under part 1 of article 26 of title 39, for
failure to collect or remit a prepaid wireless 911 charge in accordance with
this section.
(b) A seller or provider who uses federally supported services or
programs may deduct and retain three and three-tenths percent of the
prepaid wireless 911 charges that are collected by the seller OR PROVIDER
from consumers.
(d) The department shall, by rule, establish procedures by which a
seller OR PROVIDER may document that a transaction is not a retail
transaction, which procedures must substantially coincide with the
procedures for documenting that a sale was wholesale for purposes of the
sales tax under part 1 of article 26 of title 39.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-102, amend (9)
as follows:
39-21-102. Scope.
(9) This article 21 applies to the fee FEES imposed pursuant to
section 40-17-104 SECTIONS 40-17-104 AND 40-17.5-104, but only to the
extent that this article 21 is not inconsistent with section 40-17-104
SECTIONS 40-17-104 AND 40-17.5-104.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-113, amend (26)
as follows:
39-21-113. Reports and returns - rule - repeal.
(26) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the executive
director shall provide the information disclosed in any document, report, or
return filed in connection with the prepaid wireless 911 charge imposed by
section 29-11-102.5 to the public utilities commission created in section
40-2-101 or a governing body as defined in section 29-11-101 (16). Any
information provided to the public utilities commission or governing body,
pursuant to this subsection (26) shall remain SUBSECTION (26)(a) REMAINS
confidential, and all agents, clerks, and employees of the commission or
AND THE governing body and the department shall be ARE subject to the
limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section and the penalties
contained in subsection (6) of this section.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL PROVIDE TO THE PUBLIC
UTILITIES COMMISSION CREATED IN SECTION 40-2-101 AND THE
COMMUNICATION SERVICES FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES ENTERPRISE
CREATED IN SECTION 26-21-103.5 THE INFORMATION DISCLOSED IN ANY
DOCUMENT, REPORT, OR RETURN FILED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PREPAID
TELEPHONE DISABILITY ACCESS CHARGE IMPOSED BY SECTION 40-17-104.
ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION AND THE ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (26)(b) REMAINS CONFIDENTIAL, AND ALL
AGENTS, CLERKS, AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMISSION AND THE ENTERPRISE
ARE SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE PENALTIES CONTAINED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS
SECTION.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL PROVIDE TO THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
CREATED IN SECTION 40-2-101 AND THE 988 CRISIS HOTLINE ENTERPRISE
CREATED IN SECTION 27-64-103 THE INFORMATION DISCLOSED IN ANY
DOCUMENT, REPORT, OR RETURN FILED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PREPAID
WIRELESS 988 CHARGE IMPOSED BY SECTION 40-17.5-104. ANY
INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE COMMISSION AND THE ENTERPRISE
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (26)(c) REMAINS CONFIDENTIAL, AND ALL
AGENTS, CLERKS, AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMISSION ARE SUBJECT TO THE
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

LIMITATIONS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION AND THE
PENALTIES CONTAINED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-119.5, amend
(2)(t) and (2)(u); and add (2)(v) as follows:
39-21-119.5. Mandatory electronic filing of returns - mandatory
electronic payment - penalty - waiver - definitions.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
executive director may, as specified in subsection (3) of this section, require
the electronic filing of returns and require the payment of any tax or fee due
by electronic funds transfer for the following:
(t) Any prepaid telephone disability access charge report required to
be filed and payment required to be made pursuant to section 40-17-104;
and
(u) Any retail delivery fee or enterprise retail delivery fees return
required to be filed pursuant to section 43-4-218 (6); AND
(v) ANY PREPAID WIRELESS 988 CHARGE REPORT REQUIRED TO BE
FILED AND PAYMENT REQUIRED TO BE MADE PURSUANT TO SECTION
40-17.5-104 (2).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-17-101, add (5.5)
and (9.5) as follows:
40-17-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 17, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5.5) "PREPAID WIRELESS TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 29-11-101 (21).
(9.5) "TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 40-15-102 (29).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-17-104, add (5) as
follows:
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

40-17-104. Prepaid telephone disability access charges collected
for the enterprise - prepaid telephone disability access charge cash fund
- created - remittance - rules.
(5) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO PREPAID WIRELESS
TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE. ALL OTHER TELECOMMUNICATIONS
SERVICES ARE SUBJECT TO SECTIONS 40-17-102 AND 40-17-103.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-17.5-101,
amend (10); and add (9.7), (9.9), and (14) as follows:
40-17.5-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 17.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(9.7) "PROVIDER" MEANS A PERSON THAT PROVIDES PREPAID
WIRELESS TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE.
(9.9) "PURCHASE" MEANS EXCHANGES OF MONEY AND EXCHANGES
OF NONMONETARY CONSIDERATION, SUCH AS CONSUMER INFORMATION
REQUIRED FOR REIMBURSEMENT CLAIMS UNDER FEDERALLY SUPPORTED
SERVICES OR PROGRAMS.
(10) "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service from a seller OR PROVIDER for any purpose
other than resale.
(14) "TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 40-15-102 (29).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-17.5-104, amend
(1)(a), (2)(a), and (2)(b); and add (4) as follows:
40-17.5-104. Prepaid wireless 988 charge - collection - rules.
(1) (a) The seller shall collect, on behalf of the 988 crisis hotline
enterprise, the prepaid wireless 988 charge imposed by the enterprise
pursuant to section 27-64-103 (4)(b) from the consumer on each retail
transaction occurring in the state. The amount of the prepaid wireless 988
charge shall be either disclosed to the consumer or separately stated or
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

stated on the same line item as the 911 surcharge created in section
29-11-102.3 PREPAID WIRELESS 911 CHARGE CREATED IN SECTION
29-11-102.5 on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document the seller
provides to the consumer. A seller shall elect to either disclose or separately
state the charge and shall not change the election without the written
consent of the department. The seller is deemed to have collected the charge
notwithstanding the seller's failure to separately disclose or state the charge
on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document the seller provides to the
consumer. A PROVIDER THAT USES FEDERALLY SUPPORTED SERVICES OR
PROGRAMS TO OFFER CUSTOMERS FREE PREPAID WIRELESS
TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE IS DEEMED TO HAVE COLLECTED THE
CHARGE AND SHALL REMIT THE CHARGE FOR EACH RETAIL TRANSACTION
THAT OCCURS IN COLORADO.
(2) (a) The seller OR PROVIDER THAT USES FEDERALLY SUPPORTED
SERVICES OR PROGRAMS shall remit any collected prepaid wireless 988
charges to the department at the times and in the manner provided in part
1 of article 26 of title 39. The department shall establish, by rule,
registration and payment procedures that substantially coincide with the
registration and payment procedures that apply under part 1 of article 26 of
title 39. A seller OR PROVIDER is subject to the penalties under part 1 of
article 26 of title 39 for failure to collect or remit a prepaid wireless 988
charge in accordance with this section.
(b) A seller OR PROVIDER THAT USES FEDERALLY SUPPORTED
SERVICES OR PROGRAMS may deduct and retain three and three-tenths
percent of the prepaid wireless 988 charges that are collected by the seller
OR PROVIDER from the consumers.
(4) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO PREPAID WIRELESS
TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE. ALL OTHER TELECOMMUNICATIONS
SERVICES ARE SUBJECT TO SECTIONS 40-17.5-102 AND 40-17.5-103.
SECTION 11. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1115

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1115